Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 28-1801 to 28-1806 shall be known and may be cited as the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act.

Laws 1985, LB 668, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1106, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 28-1463.01;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 1.